Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-540
Policy; permissible provisions.

Any motor vehicle liability policy may provide that the insured shall reimburse the insurance carrier for any payment the insurance carrier would not have been obligated to make under the terms of the policy except for the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 40, p. 497.